sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
aerigheddu/e po:nùmene
allegru/eF po:agetivu
Antoni/h po:nùmene pròpiu
aplicabilidade/e po:nùmene
bassu/Ee po:agetivu
fangu/e po:nùmene
gileco/e po:nùmene
Giuanna/h po:nùmene pròpiu
Giuanni/h po:nùmene pròpiu
isciambregu/e po:agetivu
iscioncu/e po:agetivu
largu/Ff po:agetivu
nieddu/Ef po:agetivu
pagu/EeF po:agetivu
professionalidade/e po:nùmene
sacu/Be po:nùmene
tontu/EFf po:agetivu
